North Carolina, session 2025, HB419.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding G.S. 143C-5-2 and Article 6 of Chapter 146 of the
General Statutes, there is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Trustees of The
University of North Carolina the sum of four million five hundred thousand dollars ($4,500,000)
in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used to purchase certain real property,
and improvements thereon, adjacent to the Stevens Center, located at 411 W. 4th Street in
Winston-Salem.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H419-v-1*